Washington statutes.
RCW 36.150.040

Satisfaction of public interest or welfare—Declaration of county assumption—Vesting of authority—Abolishment of county ferry district governing body.

(1) If, after receiving testimony, the county legislative authority determines that the public interest or welfare would be satisfied by the county assuming the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the county ferry district, the county legislative authority may declare that to be its intent and assume such rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations by ordinance or resolution, providing that the county is vested with every right, power, immunity, function, and obligation currently granted to or possessed by the county ferry district pursuant to RCW 36.54.110 through 36.54.190. However, in exercising such rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations, all actions must be taken in the name of the county and title to all property or property rights vest in the county.

(2) Upon assumption of the rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations of the county ferry district by the county: The governing body established pursuant to RCW 36.54.110(5) must be abolished; RCW 36.54.110(5) does not apply to the county; and the county legislative authority is vested with all rights, powers, immunities, functions, and obligations otherwise vested by law in the governing board of the county ferry district. However, in any county with a home rule charter, such rights, powers, functions, and obligations vest in accordance with the executive and legislative responsibilities defined in such charter.

[ 2014 c 51 s 4.]